Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-667.01
Super-two highway, defined.

Super-two highway means a two-lane highway designed primarily for through traffic with passing lanes spaced intermittently and on alternating sides of the highway to provide predictable opportunities to pass slower moving vehicles.

Laws 2018, LB1009, § 5.